California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The clerk of the court of the appointing judge shall immediately notify each person appointed a member of a county or regional juvenile justice commission and thereupon such person shall appear before the appointing judge and qualify by taking an oath faithfully to perform the duties of a member of the juvenile justice commission. The qualification of each member shall be entered in the juvenile court record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

A juvenile justice commission shall elect a chairman and vice chairman annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

It shall be the duty of a juvenile justice commission to inquire into the administration of the juvenile court law in the county or region in which the commission serves. For this purpose the commission shall have access to all publicly administered institutions authorized or whose use is authorized by this chapter situated in the county or region, shall inspect such institutions no less frequently than once a year, and may hold hearings. A judge of the juvenile court shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers at hearings of the commission.

A juvenile justice commission shall annually inspect any jail or lockup within the county which in the preceding calendar year was used for confinement for more than 24 hours of any minor. It shall report the results of such inspection together with its recommendations based thereon, in writing, to the juvenile court and to the Board of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 12, Sec. 8.   Effective February 14, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

229.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a juvenile justice commission may inquire into the operation of any group home that serves wards or dependent children of the juvenile court and is located in the county or region the commission serves. The commission may review the safety and well-being of wards or dependent children placed in the group home and the program and services provided in relation to the home’s published program statement.

(b) In conducting its review, the commission shall respect the confidentiality of minors’ records and other information protected under other provisions of law. It may review court or case records of a child provided it keeps the identities of minors named in those records confidential, and may review the financial records of a group home. However, the commission may not review the personnel records of employees or the records of donors to the group home.

(c) The commission shall give the group home manager at least 24 hours’ advance notice of a visit to a group home. If the commission believes that there is a serious violation of applicable licensing laws or regulations or that residents of a group home are in danger of physical or mental abuse, abandonment or other substantial threat to their health and safety, the commission shall notify the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services for appropriate action, shall consult with the presiding judge of the juvenile court and chief probation officer as to whether or not a visit is appropriate, and shall notify other juvenile justice commissions of its actions, as appropriate.

(d) Upon the completion of a visit, if the commission finds any condition in the group home that poses a danger to its residents or otherwise violates any applicable law, ordinance, or regulation, the commission shall verbally advise the group home manager of its findings, unless it determines that the advisement could be detrimental to the children placed there, and shall send written confirmation of its findings to the group home manager within 14 days. The commission may also report its findings to the presiding judge of the juvenile court, chief probation officer, State Department of Social Services, or other juvenile justice commissions as appropriate. A group home manager may meet with the juvenile justice commission, chief probation officer, county welfare director, juvenile court, or the State Department of Social Services to resolve any problem or to submit a plan of correction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

A juvenile justice commission may recommend to any person charged with the administration of any of the provisions of this chapter such changes as it has concluded, after investigation, will be beneficial. A commission may publicize its recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

Members of a juvenile justice commission shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Such reimbursement shall be made by the county of appointment or, in lieu of such actual and necessary expenses the board of supervisors may provide that the members of the commission shall be paid not to exceed the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25) per meeting not exceeding two meetings per month. In the case of a regional justice commission, the duty of reimbursement shall be divided among the participating counties in the manner prescribed by agreement of the boards of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

The board of supervisors may by ordinance provide for the establishment, support, and maintenance of one or more agencies or departments to cooperate with and assist in coordinating on a countywide basis the work of those community agencies engaged in activities designed to prevent juvenile and adult delinquency; and such agencies or departments may cooperate with any such public or community committees, agencies, or councils at their invitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

The board of supervisors may by ordinance provide for the establishment, support, and maintenance of a delinquency prevention commission, composed of not fewer than seven citizens, to coordinate on a countywide basis the work of those governmental and nongovernmental organizations engaged in activities designed to prevent juvenile delinquency. If the board so elects, it may designate the juvenile justice commission, or any other committee or council appointed pursuant to Section 232 or 235, to serve in such capacity.

The commission may receive funds from governmental and nongovernmental sources to hire an executive secretary and necessary staff and to defray needed administrative expenses. The board of supervisors may direct any county department to provide necessary staff service to the commission. The commission may expend its funds on specific projects designed to accomplish its objectives.

Members of the delinquency prevention commission shall be appointed by the board of supervisors to serve a term of four years, and they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Upon a vacancy occurring in the membership in the commission and upon the expiration in the term of office of any member, a successor shall be appointed by the board of supervisors. When a vacancy occurs for any reason other than the expiration of a term of office, the appointee to fill such vacancy shall hold office for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

The board of supervisors may appoint initial members to any delinquency prevention commission created after the effective date of the amendment made to this section at the 1973–74 Regular Session of the Legislature to hold office for the following terms: one-half of the membership of an even-numbered commission for a term of two years and one-half plus one of the membership of an odd-numbered commission for a term of two years. The remaining initial members and the term of office of each successor appointed to fill a vacancy occurring on the expiration of a term thereafter shall be four years.

For a delinquency prevention commission existing on the effective date of the amendment made to this section at the 1973–74 Regular Session of the Legislature the board of supervisors may at any time upon the expiration of all the members’ terms of office appoint members to hold office for the following terms: one-half of the membership of an even-numbered commission for a term of two years and one-half plus one of the membership of an odd-numbered commission for a term of two years. The remaining members and the term of office of each successor appointed to fill a vacancy occurring on the expiration of a term thereafter shall be four years.

Notwithstanding the preceding provisions of this section, the board of supervisors shall appoint two or more persons who are between 14 and 21 years of age to membership on a delinquency prevention commission, provided there are available persons between 14 and 21 years of age who are able to carry out the duties of a commission member in a manner satisfactory to the appointing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 751, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

233.5.

In a county having a population of over 6,000,000, the board of supervisors may assign the responsibility for assisting and advising the board and other county officers concerning the publication and distribution of allegedly indecent or pornographic materials and such other related duties as the board may determine proper to the delinquency prevention commission established pursuant to Section 233.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 431.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

The board of supervisors may by ordinance provide for the establishment, support, and maintenance of a delinquency prevention agency or department, or may assign delinquency prevention duties to any existing county agency, or department. Any such agency or department may engage in activities designed to prevent juvenile and adult delinquency, including rendering direct and indirect services to persons in the community, and may cooperate with any other agency of government in carrying out its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

The juvenile court and the probation department of any county may establish, or assist in the establishment of, any public council or committee having as its object the prevention of juvenile delinquency and may cooperate with, or participate in, the work of any such councils or committees for the purpose of preventing or decreasing juvenile delinquency, including the improving of recreational, health, and other conditions in the community affecting juvenile welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

Notwithstanding any other law, probation departments may engage in activities designed to prevent juvenile delinquency. These activities include rendering direct and indirect services to persons in the community. Probation departments shall not be limited to providing services only to those persons on probation being supervised under Section 330 or 654, but may provide services to any juveniles in the community. Services or programs offered to minors or minors’ parents or guardians who are not on probation are voluntary and shall not include probation conditions or consequences as a result of not engaging in or completing those programs or services. For minors not on probation, the provision of services or programs under this section shall not be construed to allow probation departments to maintain a formal or
 informal caseload, establish formal or informal contracts with minors or minors’ parents or guardians, or create mandated-probation conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 6.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Probation Commission [240. - 243.]

240.

In counties having a population in excess of 6,000,000 in lieu of a county juvenile justice commission, there shall be a probation commission consisting of not less than seven members who shall be appointed by the same authority as that authorized to appoint the probation officer in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 228, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

241.

The members of a probation commission appointed and holding office under prior provisions of law on January 1, 1977, shall continue in office and shall be members of the probation commission created hereby for the same term as that for which they were appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 228, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

241.1.

(a) Whenever a minor appears to come within the description of both Section 300 and Section 601 or 602, the county probation department and the child welfare services department shall, pursuant to a jointly developed written protocol described in subdivision (b), initially determine which status will serve the best interests of the minor and the protection of society. The recommendations of both departments shall be presented to the juvenile court with the petition that is filed on behalf of the minor, and the court shall determine which status is appropriate for the minor. Any other juvenile court having jurisdiction over the minor shall receive notice from the court, within five calendar days, of the presentation of the recommendations of the
 departments. The notice shall include the name of the judge to whom, or the courtroom to which, the recommendations were presented.

(b) (1) The probation department and the child welfare services department in each county shall jointly develop a written protocol to ensure appropriate local coordination in the assessment of a minor described in subdivision (a), and the development of recommendations by these departments for consideration by the juvenile court.

(2) These protocols shall require, but not be limited to, consideration of the nature of the referral, the age of the minor, the prior record of the minor’s parents for child abuse, the prior record of the minor for out-of-control or delinquent behavior, the parents’ cooperation with the
 minor’s school, the minor’s functioning at school, the nature of the minor’s home environment, and the records of other agencies that have been involved with the minor and his or her family. The protocols also shall contain provisions for resolution of disagreements between the probation and child welfare services departments regarding the need for dependency or ward status and provisions for determining the circumstances under which filing a new petition is required to change the minor’s status.

(3) (A) These protocols
 may also require immediate notification of the child welfare services department and the minor’s dependency attorney upon referral of a dependent minor to probation, procedures for release to, and placement by, the child welfare services department pending resolution of the determination pursuant to this section, timelines for dependents in secure custody to ensure timely resolution of the determination pursuant to this section for detained dependents,
 and nondiscrimination provisions to ensure that dependents are provided with any option that would otherwise be available to a nondependent minor.

(B) If the alleged conduct that appears to bring a dependent minor within the description of Section 601 or 602 occurs in, or under the supervision of, a foster home, group home, or other licensed facility that provides residential care for minors, the county probation department and the child welfare services department may
 consider whether the alleged conduct was within the scope of behaviors to be managed or treated by the foster home or facility, as identified in the minor’s case plan, needs and services plan, placement agreement, facility plan of operation, or facility emergency intervention plan, in determining which status will serve the best interests of the minor and the protection of society pursuant to subdivision (a).

(4) The protocols shall contain the following processes:

(A) A process for determining which agency and court shall supervise a child whose jurisdiction is modified from delinquency jurisdiction to dependency jurisdiction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 607.2 or subdivision (i) of Section 727.2.

(B) A process for determining which agency and court shall supervise a nonminor dependent under the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(C) A process that specifically addresses the manner in which supervision responsibility is determined when a nonminor dependent becomes subject to adult probation supervision.

(c) Whenever a minor who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court of a county pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602 is alleged to come within the description of Section 300, 601, or 602 by another county, the county probation department or child welfare services department in the county that has jurisdiction under Section 300, 601, or 602 and the county probation department or child welfare services department of the county alleging the
 minor to be within one of those sections shall initially determine which status will best serve the best interests of the minor and the protection of society. The recommendations of both departments shall be presented to the juvenile court in which the petition is filed on behalf of the minor, and the court shall determine which status is appropriate for the minor. In making their recommendation to the juvenile court, the departments shall conduct an assessment consistent with the requirements of subdivision (b). Any other juvenile court having jurisdiction over the minor shall receive notice from the court in which the petition is filed within five calendar days of the presentation of the recommendations of the departments. The notice shall include the name of the judge to whom, or the courtroom to which, the recommendations were presented.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), this section shall not authorize the filing of a petition or petitions, or the entry of an order by the juvenile court, to make a minor simultaneously both a dependent child and a ward of the court.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the probation department and the child welfare services department, in consultation with the presiding judge of the juvenile court, in any county may create a jointly written protocol to allow the county probation department and the child welfare services department to jointly assess and produce a recommendation that the child be designated as a dual status child, allowing the child to be simultaneously a dependent child and a ward of the court. This protocol shall be signed by the chief probation officer, the director of the county social services agency,
 and the presiding judge of the juvenile court prior to its implementation. A juvenile court shall not order that a child is simultaneously a dependent child and a ward of the court pursuant to this subdivision unless and until the required protocol has been created and entered into. This protocol shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the process to be used to determine whether the child is eligible to be designated as a dual status child.

(2) A description of the procedure by which the probation department and the child welfare services department will assess the necessity for dual status for specified children and the process to make joint recommendations for the court’s consideration prior to making a determination under this section. These recommendations
 shall ensure a seamless transition from wardship to dependency jurisdiction, as appropriate, so that services to the child are not disrupted upon termination of the wardship.

(3) A provision for ensuring communication between the judges who hear petitions concerning children for whom dependency jurisdiction has been suspended while they are within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602. A judge may communicate by providing a copy of any reports filed pursuant to Section 727.2 concerning a ward to a court that has jurisdiction over dependency proceedings concerning the child.

(4) A plan to collect data in order to evaluate the protocol pursuant to Section 241.2.

(5) Counties that exercise the option
 provided for in this subdivision shall adopt either an “on-hold” system as described in subparagraph (A) or a “lead court/lead agency” system as described in subparagraph (B). There shall not be any simultaneous or duplicative case management or services provided by both the county probation department and the child welfare services department. It is the intent of the Legislature that judges, in cases in which more than one judge is involved, shall not issue conflicting orders.

(A) In counties in which an on-hold system is adopted, the dependency jurisdiction shall be suspended or put on hold while the child is subject to jurisdiction as a ward of the court. When it appears that termination of the court’s jurisdiction, as established pursuant to Section 601 or 602, is likely and that reunification of the child with his or her parent
 or guardian would be detrimental to the child, the county probation department and the child welfare services department shall jointly assess and produce a recommendation for the court regarding whether the court’s
 dependency jurisdiction shall be resumed.

(B) In counties in which a lead court/lead agency system is adopted, the protocol shall include a method for identifying which court or agency will be the lead court/lead agency. That court or agency shall be responsible for case management, conducting statutorily mandated court hearings, and submitting court reports.

(f) Whenever the court determines pursuant to this section or Section 607.2 or 727.2 that it is necessary to modify the court’s jurisdiction over a dependent or ward who was removed from his or her parent or guardian and placed in foster care, the court shall ensure that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The petition under which jurisdiction
 was taken at the time the dependent or ward was originally removed is not dismissed until the new petition has been sustained.

(2) The order modifying the court’s jurisdiction contains all of the following provisions:

(A) Reference to the original removal findings and a statement that findings that continuation in the home is contrary to the child’s welfare, and that reasonable efforts were made to prevent removal, remain in effect.

(B) A statement that the child continues to be removed from the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed under the original petition.

(C) Identification of the agency that is responsible for placement and care of the
 child based upon the modification of jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 760, Sec. 4.   (AB 388)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

241.2.

(a) The Judicial Council shall convene a committee comprised of stakeholders involved in serving the needs of dependents or wards of the juvenile court, including, but not limited to, judges, probation officers, social workers, youth involved in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system, child welfare and juvenile justice attorneys, child welfare and juvenile justice advocates, education officials, and representatives from the State Department of Social Services, county child welfare agencies, and county probation departments. By January 1, 2018, the committee shall develop and report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, its recommendations to facilitate and enhance
 comprehensive data and outcome tracking for the state’s youth involved in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system. The committee’s recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A common identifier for counties to use to reconcile data across child welfare and juvenile justice systems statewide.

(2) Standardized definitions for terms related to the populations of youth involved in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system.

(3) Identified and defined outcomes for counties to track youth involved in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system, including, but not limited to, outcomes related to recidivism, health, pregnancy, homelessness,
 employment, and education.

(4) Established baselines and goals for the identified and defined outcomes specified in paragraph (3).

(5) An assessment as to the costs and benefits associated with requiring all counties to implement the committee’s recommendations.

(6) An assessment of whether a single technology system, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Social Services’ Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) or the Child Welfare Services-New System (CWS-NS), is needed to track youth in the child
 welfare system and the juvenile justice system.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall, on or before January 1, 2019, implement a function within the applicable case management system that will enable county child welfare agencies and county probation departments to identify youth involved in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system who are within their counties and shall issue instructions to all counties on how to completely and consistently track the involvement of these youth in both the child welfare system and the juvenile justice system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 637, Sec. 2.   (AB 1911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

The members of the probation commission shall hold office for four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Of those first appointed, however, one shall hold office for one year, two for two years, two for three years, and two for four years; and the respective terms of the members first appointed shall be determined by lot as soon as possible after their appointment. When a vacancy occurs in a probation commission by expiration of the term of office of any member thereof, his or her successor shall be appointed to hold office for the term of four years. When a vacancy occurs for any other reason the appointee shall hold office for the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 228, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

243.

The probation commission shall function in an advisory capacity to the probation officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 228, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The Juvenile Court [245. - 265.]

245.

Each superior court shall exercise the jurisdiction conferred by this chapter, and while sitting in the exercise of such jurisdiction, shall be known and referred to as the juvenile court. Appealable orders and judgments of the juvenile court are subject to the appellate jurisdiction of the court of appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 468.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

245.5.

In addition to all other powers granted by law, the juvenile court may direct all such orders to the parent, parents, or guardian of a minor who is subject to any proceedings under this chapter as the court deems necessary and proper for the best interests of or for the rehabilitation of the minor. These orders may concern the care, supervision, custody, conduct, maintenance, and support of the minor, including education and medical treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 182, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

246.

The presiding judge of the superior court shall annually, in the month of January, designate one or more judges of the court to hear all cases under this chapter during the ensuing year, and shall, from time to time, designate such additional judges as may be necessary for the prompt disposition of the judicial business before the juvenile court.

In all counties where more than one judge is designated as a judge of the juvenile court, the presiding judge of the superior court shall also designate one such judge as presiding judge of the juvenile court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 609.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

247.5.

The provisions of Sections 170 and 170.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to a referee, provided, that the presiding judge of the juvenile court shall if the motion is granted reassign the matter to another referee or to a judge of the juvenile court.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 553.2 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 910.)
-------------------------------------------

248.

(a) A referee shall hear those cases that are assigned to him or her by the presiding judge of the juvenile court, with the same powers as a judge of the juvenile court, except that a referee shall not conduct any hearing to which the state or federal constitutional prohibitions against double jeopardy apply unless all of the parties thereto stipulate in writing that the referee may act in the capacity of a temporary judge. A referee shall promptly furnish to the presiding judge of the juvenile court and the minor, if the minor is 14 or more years of age or if younger has so requested, and shall serve upon the minor’s attorney of record and the minor’s parent or guardian or adult relative and the attorney of record for the minor’s parent or
 guardian or adult relative a written copy of his or her findings and order and shall also furnish to the minor, if the minor is 14 or more years of age or if younger has so requested, and to the parent or guardian or adult relative, with the findings and order, a written explanation of the right of those persons to seek review of the order by the juvenile court.

(b) Service, as provided in this section, shall be made as follows:

(1) If a minor, parent, or guardian is present in court at the time the findings and order are made, then the findings and order may be served in court on any minor, parent, or guardian who is present in court on that date and a written explanation of the right to seek review of the order as required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be furnished at that
 time.

(2) If paragraph (1) is not applicable, service shall be made by mail or electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, within the time period specified in Section 248.5, to the last known address of those persons or to the address designated by those persons appearing at the hearing before the referee and the documents served shall include, if applicable, the written explanation of the right to seek review of the order. If the parent or guardian does not have a last known address or electronic service address designated, service shall be to that party in care of his or her counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 109.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

248.5.

All written findings and orders of the court shall be served by the clerk of the court personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, within three judicial days of their issuance on the petitioner, the minor or the minor’s counsel, the parent or the parent’s counsel, and the guardian or the guardian’s counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 110.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

249.

No order of a referee removing a minor from his home shall become effective until expressly approved by a judge of the juvenile court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

250.

Except as provided in Section 251, all orders of a referee other than those specified in Section 249 shall become immediately effective, subject also to the right of review as hereinafter provided, and shall continue in full force and effect until vacated or modified upon rehearing by order of the judge of the juvenile court. In a case in which an order of a referee becomes effective without approval of a judge of the juvenile court, it becomes final on the expiration of the time allowed by Section 252 for application for rehearing, if application therefor is not made within such time and if the judge of the juvenile court has not within such time ordered a rehearing pursuant to Section 253.

Where a referee sits as a temporary judge, his or her orders become final in the same manner as orders made by a judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 532, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

The judge of the juvenile court, or in counties having more than one judge of the juvenile court, the presiding judge of the juvenile court may establish requirements that any or all orders of referees shall be expressly approved by a judge of the juvenile court before becoming effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

At any time prior to the expiration of 10 days after service of a written copy of the order and findings of a referee, a minor or his or her parent or guardian or, in cases brought pursuant to Section 300, the county welfare department may apply to the juvenile court for a rehearing. That application may be directed to all or to any specified part of the order or findings, and shall contain a statement of the reasons the rehearing is requested. If all of the proceedings before the referee have been taken down by an official reporter, the judge of the juvenile court may, after reading the transcript of those proceedings, grant or deny the application. If proceedings before the referee have not been taken down by an official reporter, the application shall be granted as of right. If an application for rehearing is not granted, denied, or extended within 20 days following the date of its receipt, it shall be deemed granted. However, the court, for good cause, may extend the period beyond 20 days, but not in any event beyond 45 days, following the date of receipt of the application, at which time the application for rehearing shall be deemed granted unless it is denied within that period. All decisions to grant or deny the application, or to extend the period, shall be expressly made in a written minute order with copies provided to the minor or his or her parent or guardian, and to the attorneys of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 510, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

A judge of the juvenile court may, on his own motion made within 20 judicial days of the hearing before a referee, order a rehearing of any matter heard before a referee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

All rehearings of matters heard before a referee shall be before a judge of the juvenile court and shall be conducted de novo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

The court may appoint as subordinate judicial officers one or more persons of suitable experience, who may be a probation officer or assistant or deputy probation officers, to serve as juvenile hearing officers on a full-time or part-time basis. A hearing officer shall serve at the pleasure of the court, and unless the court makes an order terminating the appointment of a hearing officer, the hearing officer shall continue to serve until the appointment of his or her successor. The court shall determine whether any compensation shall be paid to hearing officers, not otherwise employed by a public agency or holding another public office, and shall establish the amounts and rates thereof. An appointment of a probation officer, assistant probation officer, or deputy probation officer as a juvenile hearing officer may be made only with the consent of the probation officer. A juvenile court shall be known as the Informal Juvenile and Traffic Court when a hearing officer appointed pursuant to this section hears a case specified in Section 256.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 610.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

256.

Subject to the orders of the juvenile court, a juvenile hearing officer may hear and dispose of any case in which a minor who is between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, as of the date of the alleged offense is charged with (1) any violation of the Vehicle Code, except Section 23136, 23140, 23152, or 23153 of that code, not declared to be a felony, (2) a violation of subdivision (m) of Section 602 of the Penal Code, (3) a violation of the Fish and Game Code not declared to be a felony, (4) a violation of any of the equipment provisions of the Harbors and Navigation Code or the vessel registration provisions of the Vehicle
 Code, (5) a violation of any provision of state or local law relating to traffic offenses, loitering or curfew, or evasion of fares on a public transportation system, as defined by Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code, (6) a violation of Section 27176 of the Streets and Highways Code, (7) a violation of Section 640 or 640a of the Penal Code, (8) a violation of the rules and regulations established pursuant to Sections 5003 and 5008 of the Public Resources Code, (9) a violation of Section 33211.6 of the Public Resources Code, (10) a violation of Section 25658, 25658.5, 25661, or 25662 of the Business and Professions Code, (11) a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code, (12) a misdemeanor violation of Section 594 of the Penal Code, involving defacing property with paint or any other liquid, (13) a violation of subdivision (b), (d), or (e) of Section 594.1 of the Penal Code, (14) a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 11357 of the Health and Safety Code, (15) any infraction, (16)
 any misdemeanor for which the minor is cited to appear by a probation officer pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 660.5, or (17) a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 601 that is due to having four or more truancies, as described in Section 48260 of the Education Code, within one school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 193, Sec. 2.   (SB 1484)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

256.5.

A juvenile hearing officer may request the juvenile court judge or referee to issue a warrant of arrest against a minor who is issued and signs a written notice to appear for any violation listed in Section 256 and who fails to appear at the time and place designated in the notice. The juvenile court judge or referee may issue and have delivered for execution a warrant of arrest against a minor within 20 days after the minor’s failure to appear as promised or within 20 days after the minor’s failure to appear after a lawfully granted continuance of his or her promise to appear. A juvenile hearing officer who is also a referee or juvenile court judge may personally issue the warrant of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 679, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

257.
